District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.19

Conflict of interest.

(a)

The law applicable to conflicts of interest between a director of an entity organized under Chapter 3 of this title shall govern conflicts of interest between a limited cooperative association and a director or member of a committee of the board of directors.

(b)

A director shall not have a conflict of interest under this chapter or the organic rules solely because the director’s conduct relating to the duties of the director may further the director’s own interest.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.11.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 819 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition